Tennessee, session 114, HB1181.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-6-391(a), is amended by deleting
the language "through June 30, 2025,".
SECTION 2. The Tennessee Code Commission is requested to amend the heading to
Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-6-391, to read "Tennessee broadband equipment and
services exemption.".
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1181
002181
- 1 -